District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0526.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Leading Education Access for Reentry and Necessary Success
(“LEARNS”) Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec 2. An Act To create a Department of Corrections in the District of Columbia, approved
June 27, 1946 (60 Stat. 320; D.C. Official Code § 24-211.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2(b) (D.C. Official Code § 24-211.02(b)) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (9) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(2) The first paragraph (10) is amended by striking the period and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(3) The second paragraph (10) is redesignated as paragraph (11).
(4) Paragraph (11) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “;
and” in its place.
(5) A new paragraph (12) is added to read as follows:
“(12) During each school year:
“(A) Provide a free appropriate public education under the IDEA and
District law, to individuals with disabilities who are in its custody and detained in its secure
facilities from the age of 18 through the end of the individual’s eligibility for special education and
related services under the IDEA and District law; and
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(B) Following a request for evaluation by the individual or a person
authorized to request an evaluation pursuant to 5-A DCMR § 3004, shall evaluate individuals in its
custody and detained in its secure facilities, who are age 18 through the end of the individual’s
eligibility for special education and related services under the IDEA and District law, and who
were not previously assessed for special education services, to determine if the individual is a child
with a disability.”.
(b) New sections 11a, 11b, and 11c are added to read as follows:
“Sec. 11a. Education services.
“(a) The Department of Corrections, as the agency responsible for ensuring a free
appropriate public education, shall make a free appropriate public education available to all
students with a disability from age 18 through the end of the individual’s eligibility for special
education and related services under the IDEA and District law who are in the custody of the
Department of Corrections, including students who, in the last educational placement prior to
their incarceration in an adult correctional facility, were not identified as being a child with a
disability in accordance with Chapter 30 of Subtitle A of Title 5 of the District of Columbia
Municipal Regulations (5-A DCMR § 3001 et seq.) (“Chapter 30”), or who did not have an
individualized education program in accordance with Chapter 30.
“(b) The Department of Corrections shall contract for the delivery of education services
necessary to provide free appropriate public education to students eligible under this section. The
contracted education provider shall, at a minimum:
“(1) Have experience and expertise in providing education in the District;
“(2) Manage and run a high school diploma program within the Department of
Corrections that offers credit-bearing courses and post-secondary planning and preparation;
“(3) Be able to provide in-person instruction to every eligible student, including
those in segregated or restricted housing and on medical units;
“(4) Understand the unique social, emotional, and learning needs of incarcerated
students; and
“(5) Be able to implement every student’s individualized education program.
“Sec. 11b. Grievance and service request tracking system.
“(a) Beginning January 1, 2027, the Department of Corrections (“Department”) shall
establish and maintain on its website an online portal, which shall include a grievance and service
request tracking system, that shall:
“(1) Be accessible to individuals in the Department’s custody for the purpose of
submitting, tracking, and receiving updates on service requests, grievances, and complaints through
the tracking system;
“(2) Provide a public facing, view-only interface that allows members of the public
to search and view aggregate information from the tracking system, but does not permit the public
to submit, modify, or otherwise input service requests, grievances, or complaints;
“(3) Provide individuals in the Department’s custody with access to:
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(A) Contact information for the Director, Deputy Director of Education,
Programs, and Case Management, Deputy Director of Operations, and other agency leadership
responsible for receiving, tracking, and resolving grievances, as well as the Corrections Information
Council and Council Committee with oversight of the Department;
“(B) Information regarding the number of service requests, grievances, or
complaints to staff made by the individual in the Department’s custody, including those related to
Council proceedings, available resources, and access to the Advisory Neighborhood
Commissioner;
“(C) A list of the rights of each individual residing in the correctional
facility; and
“(D) Instructions on how individuals in the Department’s custody may
submit a service request, grievance, or complaint and track the service request, grievance, or
complaint in the tracking system, including viewing real-time updates posted by the Department
to the tracking system.
“(b)(1) By July 1, 2027, the Department shall assign each service request, grievance, or
complaint submitted to the tracking system a unique ticket number.
“(2) Each ticket shall be searchable through the tracking system described in
subsection (a) of this section by ticket number, date of submission, status, and the nature of the
service request, grievance, or complaint.
“(3) The public-facing portal shall allow members of the public to search and view
aggregate ticket data including the ticket number, date of submission, and status and nature of the
service request, grievance, or complaint, but shall not allow the public to access personally
identifiable information or to submit, alter, or interact with any ticket.
“(4) The tracking system shall provide for each submission:
“(A) The nature of the service request, grievance, or complaint;
“(B) The date of submission;
“(C) The current status of the service request, grievance, or complaint;
“(D) Whether or not the service request, grievance, or complaint is open or
closed; and
“(E) Information on how the individual or their family member may contact
the Department to receive additional information on the status or resolution of the service request,
grievance, or complaint.
“(5) The Department may prescribe the format in which submissions to the tracking
system are to be made; provided, that the Department shall accept submissions made by individuals
in the Department’s custody in writing and via oral communication.
“(c) Within 30 days after the launch of the tracking system pursuant to subsection (b)(1) of
this section, the Department shall input into the tracking system all service requests, grievances, and
complaints received by the Department in the preceding 6 months that are open.
“Sec. 11c. Definitions.
“For the purposes of this act, the term:
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(1) “Free appropriate public education” shall have the same meaning as provided
in section 101(3) of the Placement of Students with Disabilities in Nonpublic Schools
Amendment Act of 2006, effective March 14, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-269; D.C. Official Code § 38-
2561.01(3)).
“(2) “IDEA” shall have the same meaning as provided in section 101(4) of the
Placement of Students with Disabilities in Nonpublic Schools Amendment Act of 2006, effective
March 14, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-269; D.C. Official Code § 38-2561.01(4)).
“(3) “Individualized education program” means a written plan that specifies the
special education programs and services to be provided to meet the unique educational needs of a
child with a disability, as required under section 614(d) of the IDEA (20 U.S.C. § 1414(d)).”.
Sec. 3. Section 3001 of Subtitle A of Title 5 of the District of Columbia Municipal
Regulations (5-A DCMR § 3001), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection 3001.16 is repealed.
(b) Subsection 3001.17 is repealed.
Sec. 4. Chapter 3 of Title 14 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended
as follows:
(a) Section 14-310(b)(4) is amended as follows:
(1) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase “whom the victim has”
and inserting the phrase “whom a victim under 18 years of age has” in its place.
(2) Subparagraph (C) is amended by striking the phrase “the victim” and inserting
the phrase “a victim who is under 18 years of age” in its place.
(b) Section 14-311(b)(4) is amended as follows:
(1) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase “with whom the victim
has” and inserting the phrase “with whom a victim under 18 years of age has” in its place.
(2) Subparagraph (C) is amended by striking the phrase “the victim” and inserting
the phrase “a victim who is under 18 years of age” in its place.
(c) Section 14-312(b)(5) is amended as follows:
(1) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase “with whom the sexual
assault victim has” and inserting the phrase “with whom a sexual assault victim under 18 years
of age has” in its place.
(2) Subparagraph (C) is amended by striking the phrase “the sexual assault
victim” and inserting the phrase “a sexual assault victim who is under 18 years of age” in its
place.
Sec. 5. Title 20 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Section 20-311 is amended to read as follows:
“§ 20-311. Nature of proceeding.
“(a) An abbreviated probate proceeding is a proceeding for probate of a will or a
determination of a decedent’s intestacy and for the appointment of a personal representative.
4

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
This proceeding is instituted when an interested person files a petition for an abbreviated probate
proceeding with the Court in accordance with the provisions of § 20-304. This proceeding may
be conducted without the prior notice required for formal probate under § 20-323.
“(b) The finality of abbreviated probate shall be governed by § 20-331.”.
(b) Section 20-312 is amended to read as follows:
“§ 20-312. Action on petition.
“(a) General. — Upon a request for abbreviated probate filed in accordance § 20-304, the
Court or the Register of Wills shall appoint one or more personal representatives, except as
provided in § 20-322. The appointment of a personal representative shall constitute an Order for
unsupervised administration, unless the Order specifically provides for supervised administration
as provided in § 20-402. In no event, however, shall the appointment of a personal representative
be delayed pending the Court’s decision with regard to whether the administration will be
supervised or unsupervised.
“(b) Wills. — In the case of a petition to admit a will to abbreviated probate, due
execution of the will shall be presumed and the Court or the Register of Wills may admit a will
to probate either:
“(1) If the will appears to have been duly executed and contains a recital by
attesting witnesses of facts constituting due execution; or
“(2) Upon the verified statement of any person with personal knowledge of the
circumstances of execution, whether or not the person was in fact an attesting witness, reciting
facts showing due execution of the will.
“(c) Additional Proof. — The Register of Wills may require additional verified proof,
which shall be filed in the proceeding. If the Register of Wills requires additional proof, the
matter may be referred to the Court to determine if one or more personal representatives shall be
appointed and whether the will should be admitted to probate.”.
(c) Section 20-323(a) is amended by striking the phrase “legal periodical of general
circulation in the District” and inserting the phrase “legal periodical or newspaper of general
circulation in the District” in its place.
(d) Section 20-343(a) is amended by striking the phrase “legal periodical of general
circulation in the District” and inserting the phrase “legal periodical or newspaper of general
circulation in the District” in its place.
(e) Section 20-361(a)(4) is repealed.
(f) Section 20-704(a) is amended by striking the phrase “legal periodical of general
circulation in the District” and inserting the phrase “legal periodical or newspaper of general
circulation in the District” in its place.
Sec. 6. Section 7 of the Strengthening Probate Administration Amendment Act of 2024,
effective March 21, 2025 (D.C. Law 25-302; 72 DCR 780), is amended by adding a new
subsection (d) to read as follows:
“(d) This act shall apply to estates of decedents who died on or after March 21, 2025.”.
5

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 7. Section 3 of the Volunteers Services Act of 1977, effective June 28, 1977 (D.C.
Law 2-12; D.C. Official Code § 1-319.02), is amended by striking the phrase “District of
Columbia Board of Education” and inserting the phrase “Office of the State Superintendent of
Education, Attorney General for the District of Columbia,” in its place.
Sec. 8. The Criminal Justice Coordinating Council for the District of Columbia
Establishment Act of 2001, effective October 3, 2001 (D.C. Law 14-28; D.C. Official Code § 22-
4231 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 1505 (D.C. Official Code § 22-4234) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (b-9) is amended as follows:
(A) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase “no later than
180 days after the applicability date of section 30(f), (g), and (h) of the Secure DC Omnibus
Amendment Act of 2024, passed on 2nd reading on March 5, 2024 (Enrolled version of Bill 24-
345) (“Secure DC Omnibus”)” and inserting the phrase “no later than September 30, 2026” in its
place.
(B) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “and after the
effective date of the Secure DC Omnibus” and inserting the phrase “, after the effective date of
the Prioritizing Public Safety Emergency, and after the effective date of the Secure DC
Omnibus” in its place.
(C) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “and after the
effective date of the Secure DC Omnibus” and inserting the phrase “, after the effective date of
the Prioritizing Public Safety Emergency, and after the effective date of the Secure DC
Omnibus” in its place.
(D) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the phrase “and after the
effective date of the Secure DC Omnibus” and inserting the phrase “, after the effective date of
the Prioritizing Public Safety Emergency, and after the effective date of the Secure DC
Omnibus” in its place.
(2) Subsection (b-10) is amended as follows:
(A) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase “for juveniles”
and inserting the phrase “for juveniles, no later than September 30, 2026” in its place.
(B) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “and after the
applicability date of section 28 of the Secure DC Omnibus” and inserting the phrase “after the
effective date of the Prioritizing Public Safety Emergency, and after the effective date of the
Secure DC Omnibus” in its place.
(C) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “and after the
applicability date of section 28 of the Secure DC Omnibus” and inserting the phrase “after the
effective date of the Prioritizing Public Safety Emergency, and after the effective date of the
Secure DC Omnibus” in its place.
(D) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the phrase “and after the
applicability date of section 28 of the Secure DC Omnibus” and inserting the phrase “, after the
6

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
effective date of the Prioritizing Public Safety Emergency, and after the effective date of the
Secure DC Omnibus” in its place.
(E) Paragraph (5) is amended by striking the phrase “and after the
applicability date of section 28 of the Secure DC Omnibus” and inserting the phrase “, after the
effective date of the Prioritizing Public Safety Emergency, and after the effective date of the
Secure DC Omnibus” in its place.
(F) Paragraph (6) is amended by striking the phrase “and after the
applicability date of section 28 of the Secure DC Omnibus” and inserting the phrase “, after the
effective date of the Prioritizing Public Safety Emergency, and after the effective date of the
Secure DC Omnibus” in its place.
(G) Paragraph (7) is amended by striking the phrase “and after the
applicability date of section 28 of the Secure DC Omnibus” and inserting the phrase “, after the
effective date of the Prioritizing Public Safety Emergency, and after the effective date of the
Secure DC Omnibus” in its place.
(b) Section 1507 (D.C. Official Code § 22-4237) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (g) is amended by striking the phrase “Within 3 months after
the applicability date of section 29 of the Secure DC Omnibus Amendment Act of 2024, passed
on 2nd reading on March 5, 2024 (Enrolled version of Bill 25-345),” and inserting the phrase
“No later than June 2025,” in its place.
(2) Subsection (h) is amended by striking the phrase “Within one year after
the applicability date of section 29 of the Secure DC Omnibus Amendment Act of 2024, passed
on 2nd reading on March 5, 2024 (Enrolled version of Bill 25-345),” and inserting the phrase
“No later than July 31, 2026,” in its place.
Sec. 9. Section 3 of the Safe Passage Training and School Engagement Amendment Act
of 2025, effective September 10, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-40; 72 DCR 8170), is repealed.
Sec. 10. Applicability.
(a) Sections 2 and 3 shall apply upon the date of inclusion of their fiscal effect in an
approved budget and financial plan.
(b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in
an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council
of the certification.
(c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in
the District of Columbia Register.
(2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
applicability of the provisions identified in subsection (a) of this section.
(d) Section 8(a) shall apply as of January 1, 2025.
Sec. 11. Fiscal impact statement.
7

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a)
Sec. 12. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 60-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(2) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code§ 1-206.02(c)(2)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
8